Hawaii statutes.
§171-75 Persons disqualified to take
residential leases. No person shall be qualified to take a residential
lease under this part who, or whose husband or wife, or both of them:

(1) Has previously taken from or held under the
Territory or State any certificate of occupation, right of purchase lease, cash
freehold agreement, special homestead agreement or homestead lease, or patent
based on any of the foregoing, or has previously taken residential lease or
patent or deed to any residential lot under this part; provided that a person
who has previously taken from or held under the Territory or State or under
this part any such certificate, lease, agreement, patent, or deed to any land
shall not be disqualified, if the person has been displaced at any time from
the land by governmental authority for any public purpose or by reason of any
natural disaster;

(2) Owns other land in the State suitable for
residential use;

(3) Owns other land not suitable for residential use
if the value thereof exceeds the value of the residence lot applied for;

(4) Is the lessee under a lease having an unexpired
term of more than five years of other land in the State suitable for
residential use and which lease does not prohibit the lessee from using the
land for such purposes;

(5) Had voluntarily sold or otherwise disposed of,
within one year prior to the filing of the person's application, any land or
lease described in (2), (3) and (4). [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-71;
HRS §171-75; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next